Hawaii statutes.
§626-3 Inconsistent laws. If any other
provision of law, including any rule promulgated by the supreme court, is
inconsistent with this chapter, this chapter shall govern unless this chapter
or such inconsistent provision of law specifically provides otherwise. [L 1980,
c 164, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next